Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.030

Slayer or abuser deemed to predecease decedent.

The slayer or abuser shall be deemed to have predeceased the decedent as to property which would have passed from the decedent or his or her estate to the slayer or abuser under the statutes of descent and distribution or have been acquired by statutory right as surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner or under any agreement made with the decedent under the provisions of RCW 26.16.120 as it now exists or is hereafter amended.

[ 2009 c 525 s 4; 2008 c 6 s 624; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.030. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 3.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.